th: รูปทรงแผ่นรอง: โค้ง; ทรงกระบอก; แบน; วงรี; ทรงไม้พาย; พาราโบลา; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; กลม; แท่ง; ทรงหยดน้ำ; อื่นๆ
hu: Párna formája: Ívelt; Henger alakú; Lapos; Ovális; Lapát; Parabolikus; Téglalap alakú; Kerek; Rúd; Csepp alakú; Egyéb
ko: 패드 모양: 커브형; 원통형; 평면형; 타원형; 패들형; 포물선형; 직사각형; 원형; 스틱형; 물방울형; 기타
fr: Forme du tampon: Incurvé; Cylindrique; Plat; Ovale; Raquette; Parabolique; Rectangulaire; Rond; Bâton; En forme de larme; Autre
el: Σχήμα ενίσχυσης: Καμπυλωτό; Κυλινδρικό; Επίπεδο; Οβάλ; Επίμηκες; Παραβολικό; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Ραβδοειδές; Σχήμα σταγόνας; Άλλο
pt-BR: Almofada, formato: Curvo; Cilíndrico; Plano; Oval; Pá; Parabólico; Retangular; Redondo; Bastão; Gota; Outro
es: Forma de la almohadilla: Curvo; Cilíndrico; Plano; Ovalado; Paleta; Parabólico; Rectangular; Redondo; De palo; Lágrima; Otro
ja: パッド形状: カーブ; 円柱; フラット; 楕円; パドル; パラボラ; 長方形; ラウンド; スティック; ティアドロップ; その他
vi: Hình dạng tấm đệm: Cong; Hình trụ; Phẳng; Bầu dục; Mái chèo; Đường parabol; Hình chữ nhật; Tròn; Thanh; Giọt nước; Khác
zh-TW: 護墊形狀: 弧形; 圓柱形; 扁平; 橢圓形; 槳形; 拋物線形; 長方形; 圓形; 棒形; 淚滴形; 其他
sv: Form på dyna: Böjd; Cylindrisk; Platt; Oval; Paddel; Parabolisk; Rektangulär; Rund; Pinne; Droppformad; Övrigt
it: Forma del pad: Curvo; Cilindrico; Piatto; Ovale; A paletta; Parabolico; Rettangolare; Rotondo; A bastoncino; A goccia; Altro
lt-LT: Bloko forma: Išlenktas; Cilindrinis; Plokščias; Ovalus; Irklo formos; Parabolinis; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Lazdos formos; Ašaros formos; Kita
en: Pad shape: Curved; Cylindrical; Flat; Oval; Paddle; Parabolic; Rectangular; Round; Stick; Teardrop; Other
ro-RO: Formă a protecției: Curbat; Cilindric; Plat; Oval; Paletă; Parabolic; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; Băț; Lacrimă; Altele
de: Schlagpolsterform: Gebogen; Zylindrisch; Flach; Oval; Paddel; Parabolisch; Rechteckig; Rund; Stick; Tropfenförmig; Sonstige
da: Pudeform: Buet; Cylindrisk; Flad; Oval; Plade; Parabolsk; Rektangulær; Rund; Pind; Dråbeformet; Andet
ru: Форма подушки/прокладки: Изогнутая; Цилиндрическая; Плоская; Овальная; В форме весла; Параболическая; Прямоугольная; Круглая; В форме палочки; Каплевидная; Другое
sk-SK: Tvar podložky: Zakrivený; Valcovitý; Plochý; Oválny; V tvare pádla; Parabolický; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Tyčinka; V tvare slzy; Iné
sl-SI: Oblika blazinice: Ukrivljeno; Cilindrično; Ravno; Ovalno; V obliki vesla; Parabolično; Pravokotno; Okroglo; V obliki palice; V obliki solze; Drugo
bg-BG: Форма на подложката: Извит; Цилиндричен; Плосък; Овален; Лапа; Параболичен; Правоъгълен; Кръгъл; Пръчка; Капковиден; Друго
fi: Pehmusteen muoto: Kaareva; Lieriömäinen; Litteä; Ovaali; Mela; Parabolinen; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Tikku; Pisara; Muu
tr: Ped şekli: Kavisli; Silindirik; Düz; Oval; Raket; Parabolik; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Çubuk; Gözyaşı damlası; Diğer
nl: Vorm van pad: Gebogen; Cilindrisch; Plat; Ovaal; Peddel; Parabolisch; Rechthoekig; Rond; Stok; Druppelvormig; Overig
pl: Kształt podkładki: Zakrzywiony; Cylindryczny; Płaski; Owalny; W kształcie wiosła; Paraboliczny; Prostokątny; Okrągły; Podłużny; W kształcie łezki; Inne
cs: Tvar podložky: Zakřivený; Válcový; Plochý; Oválný; Pálka; Parabolický; Obdélníkový; Kulatý; Tyčka; Kapka; Jiné
pt-PT: Forma da almofada: Curvo; Cilíndrico; Plano; Oval; Pá; Parabólico; Retangular; Redondo; Bastão; Lágrima; Outro
hr-HR: Oblik jastučića: Zakrivljen; Cilindričan; Ravan; Ovalan; Veslo; Paraboličan; Pravokutan; Okrugao; Štapić; U obliku suze; Ostalo
nb: Puteform: Buet; Sylindrisk; Flat; Oval; Åre; Parabolsk; Rektangulær; Rund; Pinne; Dråpeformet; Annet
zh-CN: 拳靶形状: 弧形; 圆柱形; 扁平; 椭圆形; 桨形; 抛物线形; 长方形; 圆形; 棒形; 水滴形; 其他